Alabama, session 2026rs, HB200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a)(1) The Escambia County Commission, prior
to December 1, 2026, may levy and provide for the collection
of an annual additional motor vehicle license and registration
issuance fee in the amount of up to five dollars ($5) on each
new registration, transfer, or renewal on any vehicle in the
county with the motor vehicle license and registration year
commencing on January 1, 2027.
(2) The issuance fee authorized by this section may
only be for one continuing annual fee of up to five dollars
($5).
(3) The county's license issuing official shall collect
the issuance fee on each new registration, transfer, or
renewal on a vehicle in the county.
(4) The issuance fee shall be in addition to all other
fees, taxes, or other charges provided for the license and
registration of a vehicle.
(b) The license issuing official, on a monthly basis,
shall distribute the proceeds of the issuance fee levied
pursuant to this section to the Sheriff's Law Enforcement Fund
for law enforcement purposes.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
Page 1

Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
HB200 Enrolled
2026.
Page 2

2026.
HB200 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 20-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 22-Jan-26 Passed



Page 3